District of Columbia statutes.
7-122

Powers and duties.

(a)

The Mayor’s Council shall:

(1)

Advise the Mayor on matters related to physical fitness, obesity, and nutrition;

(2)

Develop objectives to raise awareness of the:

(A)

Risks of obesity;

(B)

Benefits of physical activity and fitness; and

(C)

Benefits of healthy eating;

(3)

Publish an annual report on the state of physical fitness, obesity, and nutrition, including any recommendations (“fitness report”);

(4)

Publish an annual report detailing all gifts, donations, and other funds received and all expenditures; and

(5)

Perform any other duties as determined by the Mayor to be necessary or appropriate.

(b)

The Mayor’s Council may solicit and receive contributions to support the purposes of this subchapter.

Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-58, § 3, 58 DCR 8969
This section is referenced in § 7-124.